North Carolina, session 2025, SB821.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The property identified by Haywood County Parcel Identification
Number 8604-93-8795, also known as 86 Magellan Drive, is removed from the corporate limits
of the Town of Waynesville.
SECTION 2. This act has no effect on the validity of any liens of the Town of
Waynesville for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of
this act. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this act as
though the property was still within the corporate limits of the Town of Waynesville.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective June 30, 2026. Property in the territory
described by Section 1 of this act as of January 1, 2026, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.
*S821-v-1*